North Carolina statutes. Chapter 22B. Contracts Against Public Policy.
Article 2. Jury Trial Waivers Unenforceable.

§ 22B-10.
Contract provisions waiving jury trial unenforceable.

Any provision in a contract requiring a party to the contract to waive his right to a jury trial is unconscionable as a matter of law and the provision shall be unenforceable. This section does not prohibit parties from entering into agreements to arbitrate or engage in other forms of alternative dispute resolution.

History.

1993, c. 463, s. 5; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 763, s. 2.

§§ 22B-11 through 22B-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.